dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
PFX t0 N 217
PFX t0 an anze/c0 an[^e]
PFX t0 an anzë/c0 anengen
PFX t0 a anze/c0 a[^nu]
PFX t0 aus ausze/c0 aus[^e]
PFX t0 ausenaner ausenanerze/c0 ausenaner
PFX t0 ausernee auserneenze/c0 ausernee[^n]
PFX t0 auserneen auserneenze/c0 auserneen
PFX t0 bauch bauchze/c0 bauch
PFX t0 blouss bloussze/c0 blouss
PFX t0 blo bloze/c0 blo[^u]
PFX t0 brooch broochze/c0 brooch
PFX t0 bäi bäize/c0 bäi
PFX t0 deel deelze/c0 deel
PFX t0 derbäi derbäize/c0 derbäi
PFX t0 dergéint dergéintze/c0 dergéint
PFX t0 dertëscht dertëschtze/c0 dertëscht
PFX t0 dertëschent dertëschentze/c0 dertëschent
PFX t0 do doze/c0 dob[el]
PFX t0 do doze/c0 dohal
PFX t0 dobäi dobäize/c0 dobäi
PFX t0 dogéint dogéintze/c0 dogéint
PFX t0 dohin dohinze/c0 dohin
PFX t0 dohi dohinze/c0 dohi[^n]
PFX t0 dotëscht dotëschtze/c0 dotëscht
PFX t0 dotëschent dotëschentze/c0 dotëschent
PFX t0 dout doutze/c0 dout
PFX t0 dran dranze/c0 dran
PFX t0 dra dranze/c0 dra[^n]
PFX t0 drop dropze/c0 drop
PFX t0 drun drunze/c0 drun
PFX t0 dru drunze/c0 dru[^n]
PFX t0 duerch duerchze/c0 duerch[^e]
PFX t0 dovun dovunze/c0 dovun
PFX t0 dervun dervunze/c0 dervun
PFX t0 dervu dervunze/c0 dervu[^n]
PFX t0 driwwer driwwerze/c0 driwwer
PFX t0 duer duerze/c0 duer[^c]
PFX t0 déck déckze/c0 déck
PFX t0 ëm ëmze/c0 ëm[^e]
PFX t0 ënner ënnerze/c0 ënner
PFX t0 entgéint entgéintze/c0 entgéint
PFX t0 era eranze/c0 era[^nu]
PFX t0 eran eranze/c0 eran
PFX t0 eraus erausze/c0 eraus[^e]
PFX t0 eraus erauszë/c0 erause
PFX t0 erbäi erbäize/c0 erbäi
PFX t0 erduerch erduerchze/c0 erduerch
PFX t0 erëm erëmze/c0 erëm[^e]
PFX t0 erëm erëmze/c0 erëme
PFX t0 eriwwer eriwwerze/c0 eriwwer
PFX t0 erof erofze/c0 erof
PFX t0 erop eropze/c0 erop
PFX t0 eru erunze/c0 eru[^n]
PFX t0 erun erunze/c0 erun
PFX t0 dovu dovunze/c0 dovu[^n]
PFX t0 ervir ervirze/c0 ervir
PFX t0 ewech ewechze/c0 ewech
PFX t0 fäerdeg fäerdegze/c0 fäerdeg
PFX t0 feel feelze/c0 feel
PFX t0 fern fernze/c0 fern
PFX t0 fest festze/c0 fest
PFX t0 flaach flaachze/c0 flaach
PFX t0 fort fortze/c0 fort
PFX t0 fräi fräize/c0 fräi
PFX t0 frësch frëschze/c0 frësch
PFX t0 friem friemze/c0 friem
PFX t0 futti futtize/c0 futti
PFX t0 géintiwwer géintiwwerze/c0 géintiwwer
PFX t0 gerued geruedze/c0 gerued
PFX t0 gläich gläichze/c0 gläich
PFX t0 grouss groussze/c0 grouss
PFX t0 gutt guttze/c0 gutt
PFX t0 hannescht hanneschtze/c0 hannescht
PFX t0 heem heemze/c0 heem
PFX t0 helleg hellegze/c0 helleg
PFX t0 hier hierze/c0 hier
PFX t0 hin hinze/c0 hin
PFX t0 hi hinze/c0 hi[^ne]
PFX t0 héich héichze/c0 héich
PFX t0 ir irze/c0 ir
PFX t0 iwwerenee iwwereneenze/c0 iwwerenee[^n]
PFX t0 iwwereneen iwwereneenze/c0 iwwereneen
PFX t0 iwwertenee iwwerteneenze/c0 iwwertenee[^n]
PFX t0 iwwerteneen iwwerteneenze/c0 iwwerteneen
PFX t0 iwwer iwwerze/c0 iwwer[^et]
PFX t0 iwwer iwwerze/c0 iwwert[ar]
PFX t0 kal kalze/c0 kal
PFX t0 kenne kennenze/c0 kenne[^n]
PFX t0 kennen kennenze/c0 kennen
PFX t0 kleng klengze/c0 kleng
PFX t0 kloer kloerze/c0 kloer
PFX t0 krank krankze/c0 krank
PFX t0 kuerz kuerzze/c0 kuerz
PFX t0 laanscht laanschtze/c0 laanscht
PFX t0 lass lassze/c0 lass
PFX t0 leed leedze/c0 leed
PFX t0 leie leienze/c0 leie[^n]
PFX t0 leien leienze/c0 leien
PFX t0 léif léifze/c0 léif
PFX t0 mat matze/c0 mat[^aet]
PFX t0 mat matzë/c0 mate
PFX t0 nei neize/c0 nei
PFX t0 néier néierze/c0 néier
PFX t0 nidder nidderze/c0 nidder
PFX t0 noeneen noeneenze/c0 noeneen
PFX t0 no noze/c0 no[^eu]
PFX t0 no nozë/c0 noe[^n]
PFX t0 of ofze/c0 of[^e]
PFX t0 op opze/c0 op[^epr]
PFX t0 platt plattze/c0 platt
PFX t0 präis präisze/c0 präis
PFX t0 prett prettze/c0 prett
PFX t0 schéi schéinze/c0 schéi[^n]
PFX t0 schéin schéinze/c0 schéin
PFX t0 schlau schlauze/c0 schlau
PFX t0 schwaach schwaachze/c0 schwaach
PFX t0 sécher sécherze/c0 sécher
PFX t0 séileg séilegze/c0 séileg
PFX t0 sëtze sëtzenze/c0 sëtze[^n]
PFX t0 sëtzen sëtzenze/c0 sëtzen
PFX t0 stall stallze/c0 stall
PFX t0 statt stattze/c0 statt
PFX t0 uecht uechtze/c0 uecht
PFX t0 unenee uneneenze/c0 unenee[^n]
PFX t0 uneneen uneneenze/c0 uneneen
PFX t0 u unze/c0 u[^en]
PFX t0 un unze/c0 un[^e]
PFX t0 un unzë/c0 une[^n]
PFX t0 viraus virausze/c0 viraus
PFX t0 viru virunze/c0 viru[^n]
PFX t0 virun virunze/c0 virun
PFX t0 vir virze/c0 vir[^aue]
PFX t0 vir virzë/c0 vire
PFX t0 voll vollze/c0 voll
PFX t0 vreckt vrecktze/c0 vreckt
PFX t0 wäiss wäissze/c0 wäiss
PFX t0 wéi wéize/c0 wéi
PFX t0 weider weiderze/c0 weider[^ae]
PFX t0 weider weiderzë/c0 weidere
PFX t0 wouer wouerze/c0 wouer
PFX t0 wuel wuelze/c0 wuel[^e]
PFX t0 zefridde zefriddenze/c0 zefridde[^n]
PFX t0 zefridden zefriddenze/c0 zefridden
PFX t0 zeréck zeréckze/c0 zeréck[^e]
PFX t0 zeréck zeréckzë/c0 zerécke
PFX t0 zesumme zesummenze/c0 zesumme[^n]
PFX t0 zesummen zesummenze/c0 zesummen
PFX t0 zou zouze/c0 zou[^e]
PFX t0 zou zouzë/c0 zoue
PFX t0 zréck zréckze/c0 zréck[^e]
PFX t0 zréck zréckzë/c0 zrécke
PFX t0 noenee noeneenze/c0 noenee[^n]
PFX t0 schif schifze/c0 schif
PFX t0 dozou dozouze/c0 dozou
PFX t0 do doze/c0 doloo
PFX t0 donieft donieftze/c0 donieft
PFX t0 doduerch doduerchze/c0 doduerch
PFX t0 dernieft dernieftze/c0 dernieft
PFX t0 derniewent derniewentze/c0 derniewent
PFX t0 doheem doheemze/c0 doheem
PFX t0 dowidder dowidderze/c0 dowidder
PFX t0 dofir dofirze/c0 dofir
PFX t0 dohanner dohannerze/c0 dohanner
PFX t0 do doze/c0 dohunn
PFX t0 do doze/c0 dostoen
PFX t0 derzou derzouze/c0 derzou
PFX t0 kapott kapottze/c0 kapott
PFX t0 déif déifze/c0 déif
PFX t0 derhanner derhannerze/c0 derhanner[^t]
PFX t0 derhannert derhannertze/c0 derhannert
PFX t0 riicht riichtze/c0 riicht
PFX t0 ronn ronnze/c0 ronn
PFX t0 waarm waarmze/c0 waarm
PFX t0 anenee aneneenze/c0 anenee[^n]
PFX t0 ëm ëmzë/c0 ëme
PFX t0 ronderëm ronderëmze/c0 ronderëm
PFX t0 duerchernee duercherneenze/c0 duerchernee[^n]
PFX t0 bereet bereetze/c0 bereet
PFX t0 tësche tëschenze/c0 tësche[^n]
PFX t0 hei heize/c0 hei[^h]
PFX t0 op opzë/c0 ope[^n]
PFX t0 of ofzë/c0 ofe
PFX t0 nout noutze/c0 nout
PFX t0 eidel eidelze/c0 eidel
PFX t0 vir virze/c0 vira[hn]
PFX t0 dréche dréchenze/c0 dréche
PFX t0 out outze/c0 out
PFX t0 wuel wuelzë/c0 wuele
PFX t0 schwaarz schwaarzze/c0 schwaarz
PFX t0 labber labberze/c0 labber
PFX t0 mata matanze/c0 mata
PFX t0 beienee beieneenze/c0 beienee
PFX t0 bekannt bekanntze/c0 bekannt
PFX t0 zeréck zeréckze/c0 zeréck[^e]
PFX t0 zeréck zeréckzë/c0 zerécke
PFX t0 géige géigenze/c0 géige
PFX t0 openeen openeenze/c0 openeen
PFX t0 richteg richtegze/c0 richteg
PFX t0 heihi heihinze/c0 heihi
PFX t0 schwéier schwéierze/c0 schwéier
PFX t0 schlecht schlechtze/c0 schlecht
PFX t0 matt mattze/c0 matt
PFX t0 openee openeenze/c0 openee[^n]
PFX t0 wäert wäertze/c0 wäert
PFX t0 stand standze/c0 stand
PFX t0 op opze/c0 opr[^e]
PFX t0 op opze/c0 opre[^c]
PFX t0 oprecht oprechtzë/c0 oprecht
PFX t0 op opze/c0 oprechn
PFX t0 op opze/c0 opp[^e]
PFX t0 op opze/c0 oppe[^l]
PFX t0 oppe oppenze/c0 oppel
PFX t0 bevir bevirze/c0 bevir
PFX t0 zerecht zerechtze/c0 zerecht
PFX t0 stramm strammze/c0 stramm
PFX t0 raus rausze/c0 raus[^e]
PFX t0 raus rauszë/c0 rause
