dictionaries/lb/index.dic
abezuelen/v3t0X0g1 po:verb
afachen/v0t0g0 po:verb
agesinn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
akéieren/v0t0g0 po:verb
alafen/v3t0 po:verb
amaachen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
andrécken/v0t0 po:verb
annäipen/v0t0 po:verb
anzeechnen/v3t0 po:verb
aprouwen/v0t0 po:verb
arennen/v0t0 po:verb
aschaffen/v0t0g0 po:verb
aschlëppen/v0t0 po:verb
aseeën/v0t0 po:verb
astanzen/v0t0 po:verb
ausbëlzen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ausbréngen/v0t0g2o0o1X2 po:verb
ausdrécken/v0t0 po:verb
auserneeschreiwen/v0t0 po:verb
ausgesinn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
aushéngeren/v0t0 po:verb
ausknipsen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ausläschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ausmëschten/v0t0 po:verb
ausquëtschen/v0t0 po:verb
ausrenken/v0t0 po:verb
ausschéissen/v0t0 po:verb
ausschwemmen/v0t0 po:verb
ausspriechen/v3t0 po:verb
austéitschen/v0t0 po:verb
auswëlderen/v0t0 po:verb
aweechen/v0t0g0 po:verb
bäifueren/v3t0 po:verb
bäischären/v0t0 po:verb
besangen/v3t0 po:verb
derbäidoen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
dergéintsetzen/v0t0 po:verb
dervuloossen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
dobäistellen/v0t0 po:verb
dohierkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
doloossen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
doutkräischen/v0t0 po:verb
drafueren/v3t0 po:verb
draschëdden/v0t0 po:verb
dropbezuelen/v3t0 po:verb
dropsetzen/v0t0 po:verb
drustrécken/v0t0 po:verb
duerchdenken/v0t0o0o1 po:verb
duerchfléissen/v2t0 po:verb
duerchknaen/v0t0 po:verb
duerchloossen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
duerchrutschen/v0t0 po:verb
duerchstarten/v0t0 po:verb
duerfueren/v3t0 po:verb
ëmbetten/v0t0 po:verb
ëmdréien/v0t0 po:verb
ëmgéissen/v0t0 po:verb
ëmklammen/v3t0 po:verb
ëmmodelen/v0t0 po:verb
ëmrechnen/v3t0 po:verb
ëmschwenken/v0t0 po:verb
ëmstrukturéieren/v0t0X0g1 po:verb
ënnerbotteren/v0t0g0 po:verb
ënnertunnelen/v0t0 po:verb
entgéintwierken/v0t0g0 po:verb
eraglëtschen/v0t0 po:verb
eramailen/v0t0g0 po:verb
eraquëtschen/v0t0 po:verb
eraschläichen/v0t0 po:verb
erastoussen/v3t0o1 po:verb
erausfalen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
eraushaen/v3t0g0 po:verb
erauskléngen/v0t0 po:verb
erausmaachen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
erausreechen/v0t0 po:verb
erausschläichen/v0t0 po:verb
erausstiechen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
erauswuessen/v3t0 po:verb
erbäilackelen/v0t0 po:verb
erëmbezuelen/v3t0X0g1 po:verb
erëmkennen/v0t0g2X2 po:verb
erëmwielen/v0t0g0 po:verb
eriwwerwénken/v0t0 po:verb
erofdroen/v3t0 po:verb
erofkrämpelen/v0t0 po:verb
erofrennen/v0t0 po:verb
erofsprangen/v3t0 po:verb
eropdiebelen/v0t0 po:verb
eropklappen/v0t0g0 po:verb
eropschéissen/v0t0 po:verb
erufueren/v3t0 po:verb
ervirbréngen/v0t0g2o0o1X2 po:verb
ewechbréngen/v0t0g2o0o1 po:verb
ewechhalen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
ewechräissen/v0t0 po:verb
ewechschleefen/v0t0 po:verb
ewechstrecken/v0t0 po:verb
festfréieren/v0t0 po:verb
feststellen/v0t0 po:verb
fortfueren/v3t0 po:verb
fräifroen/v3t0o0g0 po:verb
fräischwätzen/v0t0 po:verb
géigesteieren/v0t0 po:verb
gutthalen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
hanneschtsoen/v3t0o0 po:verb
héichrechnen/v3t0 po:verb
hierriichten/v0t0 po:verb
hinhuelen/v3t0o1 po:verb
ierleeden/v0t0 po:verb
iwwertrainéieren/v0t0w0 po:verb
kranklaachen/v0t0g0 po:verb
laanschtschëdden/v0t0 po:verb
lasskoppelen/v0t0 po:verb
lasszéien/v3t0 po:verb
matfillen/v0t0 po:verb
matkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
matschaffen/v0t0g0 po:verb
matzéien/v3t0 po:verb
niddermetzelen/v0t0 po:verb
nodabberen/v0t0 po:verb
nofuerschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
nokucken/v0t0g0 po:verb
nopréiwen/v0t0 po:verb
noschloen/v3t0 po:verb
noutlanden/v0t0 po:verb
ofbauen/v0t0 po:verb
ofbrennen/v0t0 po:verb
ofduschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
offléissen/v2t0 po:verb
ofhänken/v0t0o0o1 po:verb
ofkillen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofkrämpen/v0t0 po:verb
ofliwweren/v0t0 po:verb
ofpëtzen/v0t0 po:verb
ofreenen/v2t0g0 po:verb
ofschalten/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofschmaachen/v0t0 po:verb
ofschwëllen/v0t0 po:verb
ofspecken/v0t0 po:verb
ofstellen/v0t0 po:verb
oftransportéieren/v0t0X0g1 po:verb
ofweisen/v0t0 po:verb
ofzwacken/v0t0g0 po:verb
opbléien/v3t0 po:verb
opdecken/v0t0g0 po:verb
operleeën/v0t0g2X2 po:verb
opginn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
ophuelen/v3t0o1 po:verb
opkloteren/v0t0 po:verb
oplëschen/v0t0 po:verb
oppechen/v0t0 po:verb
oprechterhalen/v3t0o0o1g3X4 po:verb
opschléissen/v0t0 po:verb
opsichen/v0t0g0 po:verb
optauchen/v0t0 po:verb
rafalen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
randäerfen/v0t0o0o1g3 po:verb
raschmuggelen/v0t0 po:verb
rausfilteren/v0t0 po:verb
rauskréien/v3t0g2o0o1 po:verb
rausruffen/v3t0 po:verb
raussträichen/v0t0 po:verb
rëmfannen/v3t0g2X2 po:verb
riichtstoen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
ubaggeren/v0t0 po:verb
uféieren/v0t0 po:verb
ukierbelen/v0t0 po:verb
uléiden/v0t0 po:verb
uneneenhänken/v0t0o0o1 po:verb
upäifen/v0t0 po:verb
uschalten/v0t0g0 po:verb
uspriechen/v3t0x0 po:verb
verrutschen/v0t0g1 po:verb
virdroen/v3t0 po:verb
virplangen/v0t0 po:verb
viruleeden/v0t0 po:verb
vrecktlaachen/v0t0g0 po:verb
wechhunn/t0v5 po:verb
wechschloen/v3t0 po:verb
weiderexistéieren/v0t0X0g1 po:verb
weiderverbreeden/v0t0g1 po:verb
zeréckbréngen/v0t0g2o0o1X2 po:verb
zeréckklasséieren/v0t0X0g1w0 po:verb
zeréckstoussen/v3t0o1 po:verb
zesummegoen/v3t0g2o0o1X2 po:verb
zesummeperchen/v0t0 po:verb
zesummewierfelen/v0t0g0 po:verb
zougestoen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
zounäipen/v0t0g0 po:verb
zouspëtzen/v0t0 po:verb
zréckdenken/v0t0o0o1 po:verb
zréckkréien/v3t0g2o0o1 po:verb
zrécktrieden/v3t0 po:verb
